test/src/gt-norm-yamls/VAI_VV_IND_boodwe_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VAI - VV - boodwe :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4   5
  #per	neg     num     mod periph
     
     #this is pulled from book (p 232)
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Sg: nboodwe
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Sg: gboodwe

     #Values from slots numbered: 3
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Sg: boodwe
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+X: boodwem

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 3
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+1Pl: nboodwemi
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+21Pl: gboodwemi
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+2Pl: gboodwem
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+4: boodwewan
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Neu+3Pl: boodwewag

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Sg: nboodwenaaba
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Sg: gboodwenaaba
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Sg: nboodwenaadig
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Sg: gboodwenaadig

     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Sg: boodwewba #w-del-less
     #boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Sg: boodweba #book
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Sg: boodwewdig #w-del-less
     #boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Sg: boodwedig #book
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+X: boodwemba 
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+X: boodwemdig
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+3Sg: boodwewgoba #cons assumption -w '3' still present
     #boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+3Sg: boodwegba #book
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+4: boodwen'goba #'
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+3Pl: boodwewaagba
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+Dub+X: boodwemgoba

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 3, 4
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+1Pl: nboodwemnaaba
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+21Pl: gboodwemnaaba
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+2Pl: gboodwemwaaba
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+1Pl: nboodwemnaadig
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+21Pl: gboodwemnaadig
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+2Pl: gboodwemwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+4: boodwewbaniin #cons (w-del-less)
     #boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+4: boodwebniin   #book
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Pl: boodwewbaniig #cons (w-del-less)
     #boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Prt+3Pl: boodwebniig  #book
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+4: boodwewdigenan #cons (w-del-less)
     #boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+4: boodwedgenan   #book
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Pl: boodwewdigenag #cons (w-del-less)
     #boodwe+VAI+Ind+Pos+Dub+3Pl: boodwedgenag  #book

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Sg: nboodwesii
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Sg: gboodwesii

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3Sg: boodwesii
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+X: boodwesiim

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 2, 3
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+1Pl: nboodwesiimi
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+21Pl: gboodwesiimi
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+2Pl: gboodwesiim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 2, 5
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+4: boodwesiiwan
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Neu+3Pl: boodwesiiwag

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Sg: nboodwesiinaaba
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Sg: gboodwesiinaaba
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Sg: nboodwesiinaadig
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Sg: gboodwesiinaadig

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Sg: boodwesiiwba #w-del-less
     #boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Sg: boodwesiiba #book
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Sg: boodwesiiwdig #w-del-less
     #boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Sg: boodwesiidig #book
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+X: boodwesiimba 
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+X: boodwesiimdig
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+3Sg: boodwesiiwgoba #cons assumption of -w `3' being present
     #boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+3Sg: boodwesiigba #book
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+4: boodwesiin'goba #'
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+3Pl: boodwesiiwaagba
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+Dub+X: boodwesiimgoba

     #Values from slots numbered 1, 2, 3, 4
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+1Pl: nboodwesiimnaaba
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+21Pl: gboodwesiimnaaba
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+2Pl: gboodwesiimwaaba
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+1Pl: nboodwesiimnaadig
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+21Pl: gboodwesiimnaadig
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+2Pl: gboodwesiimwaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4, 5
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+4: boodwesiiwbaniin #cons (w-del-less)
     #boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+4: boodwesiibniin   #book
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Pl: boodwesiiwbaniig #cons (w-del-less)
     #boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Prt+3Pl: boodwesiibniig  #book
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+4: boodwesiiwdigenan #cons (w-del-less)
     #boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+4: boodwesiidgenan   #book
     boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Pl: boodwesiiwdigenag #cons (w-del-less)
     #boodwe+VAI+Ind+Neg+Dub+3Pl: boodwesiidgenag  #book
